District of Columbia statutes.
28-3815

Administrative enforcement.

(a)

As used in this section —

(1)

“Commissioner” [“Mayor”] means the Commissioner of the District of Columbia [Mayor of the District of Columbia] or his designated agent;

(b)

Compliance with the requirements imposed under this chapter shall be enforced by the Commissioner [Mayor]. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect the authority and jurisdiction of the respective agencies designated in section 108 of the Truth-in-Lending Act (82 Stat. 146 et seq.; 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.).

(c)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this act [this chapter], or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this act [this chapter], pursuant to titles I-III of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985 [Chapter 18 of Title 2]. Adjudication of any infraction of this act [this chapter] shall be pursuant to titles I-III of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985 [Chapter 18 of Title 2].

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 678, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 24, 38 DCR 314

History

Department of consumer and regulatory affairs, enforcement authority, see § 28-3903.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 28-3815.
1973 Ed., § 28-3815.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made, in brackets, in this section.

Change in Government